Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 6 Campaign Practices
7-6-207. Reports of contributions — Candidates for state or district office.

(a)

Reports Required.

(1)

Except as provided in subsections (c) and (e) of this section, each candidate for state or district office, including a district judge, or a person acting in the candidate's behalf, shall file with the Secretary of State:

(A)

For each quarter during a calendar year in which a candidate is not listed on any ballot for election, a quarterly report of all contributions received and expenditures made during that quarter. The quarterly report shall be filed no later than fifteen (15) days after the end of each quarter;

(B)

Beginning with the month of January of a calendar year in which a candidate may be listed on any ballot for election, a monthly report of all contributions received and expenditures made during that month. However, for any month in which certain days of that month are included in a preelection report required under subdivision (a)(1)(C) of this section or a final report required under subdivision (a)(1)(D) of this section, no monthly report for that month shall be due. In the case of a primary or runoff election, those days of the month occurring after the date of the election shall be carried forward and included in the next monthly report. The monthly report shall be filed no later than fifteen (15) days after the end of each month, except that the final report, covering the month during which an election is held, shall be filed within thirty (30) days after the end of the month in which the last election is held at which the candidate seeks nomination and after the end of the month in which the general election is held. With respect to a special election, the candidate shall file monthly reports under this section beginning with the month in which the special election candidate's total campaign contributions or expenditures exceed five hundred dollars ($500);

(C)

No later than seven (7) days prior to any preferential primary election, runoff election, general election, or special election in which the candidate's name appears on the ballot, a preelection report of all contributions received and expenditures made between the period covered by the previous report and the period ten (10) days before the election. In case of a runoff election, the report shall cover all contributions received and expenditures made during that period of time that begins after the date of the election from which the runoff arose and ends ten (10) days before the runoff election;

(D)

No later than thirty (30) days after the end of the month in which the candidate's name has appeared on the ballot in any primary election, runoff election, general election, or special election, or when only one (1) candidate qualifies for a particular office or position and no position or name of an unopposed candidate shall appear on a ballot, a final report of all contributions received and expenditures made which have not been disclosed on reports previously required to be filed. A final report is required regardless of whether a candidate has received contributions or made expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500); and

(E)(i)

No later than thirty (30) days after the end of the month in which the candidate has withdrawn, a final report of all contributions received and expenditures made that have not been disclosed on reports previously required to be filed.

(ii)

If a candidate withdraws from the campaign, the candidate shall notify the Secretary of State in writing of the withdrawal.

(2)

Upon receiving the first report from any candidate, or upon receipt of the candidate's notice of filing for office, the Secretary of State shall provide the candidate with information on the deadlines for filing remaining quarterly, monthly, and preelection reports and shall furnish each candidate with the appropriate instructions for complying with the deadlines.

(3)

A report is timely filed if it is filed in electronic form through the official website of the Secretary of State on or before the date that the report is due.

(b)

Contents of Reports.

(1)

The contribution and expenditure reports required by subsection (a) of this section shall indicate:

(A)

The total amount of contributions received with loans stated separately, the total amount of expenditures made during the filing periods, and the cumulative amount of those totals for the entire election cycle;

(B)

The name and address of each person, including the candidate, who made a contribution or contributions that in the aggregate exceeded fifty dollars ($50.00);

(C)

The contributor's principal place of business, employer, occupation, the amount contributed, the date the contribution was accepted by the candidate, and the aggregate contributed for each election;

(D)

The name and address of each person, including the candidate, who contributed a nonmoney item, together with a description of the item, the date of receipt, and the value, not including volunteer service by individuals;

(E)

An itemization of all single expenditures made that exceed one hundred dollars ($100), including the:

(i)

Amount of the expenditure;

(ii)

Name and address of any person, including the candidate, to whom the expenditure was made; and

(iii)

Date the expenditure was made;

(F)

A list of all paid campaign workers and the amount the workers were paid;

(G)

A list of all expenditures by categories, including, but not limited to:

(i)

Television, radio, print, or other advertising;

(ii)

Direct mail;

(iii)

Office supplies;

(iv)

Rent;

(v)

Travel;

(vi)

Expenses;

(vii)

Entertainment; and

(viii)

Telephone;

(H)

The total amount of all nonitemized expenditures made during the filing period; and

(I)

The current balance of campaign funds.

(2)(A)

When the candidate's campaign has ended, the final report shall also indicate which option under §7-6-203(g) was used to dispose of any surplus of campaign funds, the amount of funds disposed of by the candidate, and the amount of funds retained by the candidate in accordance with §7-6-201(3).

(B)

If the candidate's campaign has not ended, disposal of campaign funds shall not be required and the candidate may carry forward any remaining campaign funds to the general primary election, general election, or general runoff election for that same office.

(c)

Reports Not Required.

(1)

The candidate or any person acting in the candidate's behalf shall comply with the filings required by this section beginning with the first reporting period, either quarterly, monthly, or preelection, in which his or her total contributions or expenditures exceed five hundred dollars ($500). A candidate who has not received contributions or made expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) shall not be required to file any reports required under this section other than the final report required under subdivision (a)(1)(D) of this section. In calculating the amount of contributions received or expenditures made for purposes of this exception, the payment of the filing fee from the candidate's personal funds shall not be considered as either a contribution or an expenditure.

(2)

The preelection reports referenced in subdivision (a)(1)(C) of this section are only required for candidates with opponents in those elections.

(3)

An unopposed candidate for an office described in subdivision (a)(1) of this section or any person acting in the unopposed candidate's behalf shall not be required to file the ten-day preelection report required by subdivision (a)(1)(C) of this section.

(d)

Filings and Public Inspection.

(1)(A)(i)

The Secretary of State shall establish a filing system for reports filed under this section.

(ii)

The reports shall be kept for eight (8) years from the date of filing, catalogued by candidate in chronological order, and made available for public inspection.

(iii)

For eight (8) years after the reports are filed under this section, the Secretary of State is the official custodian of those records.

(B)(i)

After the eight-year period, the Secretary of State shall turn the reports over to the Arkansas State Archives for maintenance and continued public inspection.

(ii)

After the eight-year period, the Arkansas State Archives is the official custodian of the records of the reports filed under this section.

(C)(i)

The campaign contribution and expenditure reports filed with the Secretary of State under this section shall be filed in electronic form through the official website of the Secretary of State.

(ii)

The Arkansas Ethics Commission shall approve the format used by the Secretary of State for the filing of campaign contribution and expenditure reports in electronic form under subdivision (d)(1)(C)(i) of this section to ensure that all required information is requested.

(iii)

The official website of the Secretary of State shall allow for searches of campaign contribution and expenditure report information filed in electronic form under subdivision (d)(1)(C)(i) of this section.

(2)

The Secretary of State shall furnish to the commission, no later than thirty (30) days after each filing deadline under this section, a report listing the names of all candidates who have filed for office, the type of report filed by each candidate, and the date the report was received by the Secretary of State.

(e)

Reports by Candidates Who Have Filed for Elective Office.

If a candidate files for office during the party filing period, for the quarter including the party filing period, the candidate shall:

(1)

File monthly reports under subdivision (a)(1)(B) of this section for the months of the quarter that includes the party filing period; and

(2)

Not file a quarterly report under subdivision (a)(1)(A) of this section for the quarter that includes the party filing period.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 788, § 3; 1977, No. 312, § 1; 1985, No. 896, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1111; Acts 1987, No. 246, § 2; Init. Meas. 1990, No. 1, § 5; Acts 1993, No. 1243, § 1; 1995, No. 1263, § 1; Init. Meas. 1996, No. 1, § 4; Acts 1999, No. 103, § 1; 1999, No. 553, § 6; 2001, No. 564, § 1; 2001, No. 1839, §§ 3, 4; 2007, No. 221, § 5; 2009, No. 1204, § 3; 2011, No. 721, § 6; 2013, No. 382, §§ 2, 3; 2015, No. 999, §
1; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 1, §§ 1, 2; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 95; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 95; 2017, No. 318, §§ 2, 3; 2017, No. 721, § 5; 2019, No. 240, §§ 2, 3.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Init. Meas. 1990, No. 1, § 5, provided, in part, that “For candidates participating in the general election of 1990, the quarterly reports shall be filed for all contributions received and expenditures made after the time period covered by the final report required by the law in effect on November 6, 1990.”

Identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, § 1, provided:

“(a)

The General Assembly finds:

“(1)

State government provides vital functions that impact the lives of Arkansas citizens on a daily basis;

“(2)

While these functions are important, it is equally important to ensure that state government operates efficiently and effectively to eliminate unnecessary spending of tax dollars and provide timely and quality services to Arkansas citizens; and

“(3)

Issues such as the administrative organization of a governmental entity, the appointment structure of a governmental entity's governing board, and extraneous duties assigned to governmental entities hamper the operation of state government and result in unnecessary expenses and delays in the provision of state services.

“(b)

It is the intent of this act to amend provisions of law applicable to certain agencies, task forces, committees, and commission to promote efficiency and effectiveness in the operations of state government as a whole.”

Acts 2017, No. 318, § 7, provided:

“(a)

The Secretary of State shall provide that the website utilized for the submission of campaign contribution and expenditure reports and carryover fund reports in electronic form allows candidates to electronically upload campaign contribution and expenditure information in lieu of manual entry of each contribution and expenditure.

“(b)

The Secretary of State shall obtain the approval of the Arkansas Ethics Commission before implementing the feature required by subsection (a) of this section to ensure that all required information is requested through the website.

“(c)

This section expires on June 30, 2018.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted “with loans stated separately” in (b)(1)(A), and made a related change.

The 2011 amendment deleted “the contributor's place of business, employer, occupation, and date of the contribution and the amount contributed” at the end of (b)(1)(B); subdivided (b)(1)(E); and substituted “§7-6-201(3)” for “§7-6-203(h)” in (b)(2)(A).

The 2013 amendment substituted “general election, or special election” for “or general election” in (a)(1)(D); and added “for the entire election cycle” at the end of (b)(1)(A).

The 2015 amendment by No. 999 inserted designations (d)(1)(A)(i) and (d)(1)(A)(ii), and added (d)(1)(A)(iii); redesignated former (d)(1)(B) as (d)(1)(B)(i); and added (d)(1)(B)(ii).

The 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by No. 1 substituted “subsections (c) and (e)” for “subsection (c)” in the introductory language of (a)(1); substituted “November preceding a calendar year” for
“January in the calendar year”
in (a)(1)(B); and added (e).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 substituted “State Archives” for “History Commission” in (d)(1)(B)(i) and (ii).

The 2017 amendment by No. 318, in (a)(2), substituted “appropriate instructions” for “appropriate forms and instructions” and deleted the former second sentence; rewrote (a)(3); substituted “under” for “pursuant to” in (d)(1)(A)(i); and added (d)(1)(C).

The 2017 amendment by No. 721 substituted “state or district office” for “office other than school district, township, municipal, or county office, etc.” in the section heading; substituted
“state or district office, including a district judge” for “office, other than a school district, township, municipal, or county office” in the introductory language of (a)(1).

The 2019 amendment substituted “January of a calendar year” for “November preceding a calendar year” near the beginning of (a)(1)(B); and inserted “or when only one (1) candidate qualifies for a particular office or position and no position or name of an unopposed candidate shall appear on a ballot” in (a)(1)(D).

Cross References.

Alternative to electronic filing of reports, §
7-6-230.

7-6-208. Reports of contributions — Candidates for school district, township, or municipal office.

(a)

Reports Required.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, each candidate for school district, township, or municipal office, or a person acting in the candidate's behalf, shall:

(1)

No later than seven (7) days prior to any preferential primary election, runoff election, general election, school election, or special election in which the candidate's name appears on the ballot, file a preelection report of all contributions received and expenditures made between the period covered by the previous report, if any, and the period ten (10) days before the election. In case of a runoff election, the report shall cover all contributions received and expenditures made during that period of time that begins after the date of the election from which the runoff arose and ends ten (10) days before the runoff election;

(2)

No later than thirty (30) days after the end of the month in which the candidate's name has appeared on the ballot in any preferential primary election, runoff election, general election, school election, or special election, or when only one (1) candidate qualifies for a particular office or position and no position or name of an unopposed candidate shall appear on a ballot, file a final report of all contributions received and expenditures made that have not been disclosed on reports previously required to be filed. A final report is required regardless of whether a candidate has received contributions or made expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500);

(3)

File supplemental reports of all contributions received and expenditures made after the date of preparation of the final report. The supplemental reports shall be filed within thirty (30) days after the receipt of a contribution or the making of an expenditure; and

(4)(A)

No later than thirty (30) days after the end of the month in which the candidate has withdrawn, file a final report of all contributions received and expenditures made that have not been disclosed on reports previously required to be filed.

(B)

If a candidate withdraws from the campaign, the candidate shall notify the county clerk in writing of the withdrawal.

(b)

Contents of Reports.

(1)

The contribution and expenditure reports required by subsection (a) of this section shall indicate:

(A)

The total amount of contributions received with loans stated separately, the total amount of expenditures made during the filing periods, and the cumulative amount of those totals for the entire election cycle;

(B)

The name and address of each person, including the candidate, who made a contribution or contributions that in the aggregate exceeded fifty dollars ($50.00);

(C)

The contributor's principal place of business, employer, occupation, the amount contributed, the date the contribution was accepted by the candidate, and the aggregate contributed for each election;

(D)

The name and address of each person, including the candidate, who contributed a nonmoney item, together with a description of the item, the date of receipt, and the value, not including volunteer service by individuals;

(E)

An itemization of all single expenditures made that exceeded one hundred dollars ($100), including the amount of the expenditure, the name and address of any person, including the candidate, to whom the expenditure was made, and the date the expenditure was made;

(F)

A list of all paid campaign workers and the amount the workers were paid;

(G)

A list of all expenditures by categories, including, but not limited to:

(i)

Television, radio, print, or other advertising;

(ii)

Direct mail;

(iii)

Office supplies;

(iv)

Rent;

(v)

Travel;

(vi)

Expenses;

(vii)

Entertainment; and

(viii)

Telephone;

(H)

The total amount of all nonitemized expenditures made during the filing period; and

(I)

The current balance of campaign funds.

(2)(A)

When the candidate's campaign has ended, the final report shall also indicate which option under §7-6-203(g) was used to dispose of any surplus of campaign funds, the amount of funds disposed of by the candidate, and the amount of funds retained by the candidate in accordance with §7-6-201(3).

(B)

If the candidate's campaign has not ended, disposal of campaign funds is not required and the candidate may carry forward any remaining campaign funds to the general primary election, general election, or general runoff election for that same office.

(3)(A)

Not later than fourteen (14) days after the deadline for filing for office, the county clerk shall notify each candidate in person or by mail of the deadlines for filing the ten-day preelection and final reports required by subsection (a) of this section and, at that time, furnish each candidate with the appropriate forms and instructions for complying with the deadlines.

(B)

If notice is sent by mail, then the notice shall be postmarked within fourteen (14) days after the deadline for filing for office.

(c)

Filing of Reports.

The reports required by this section shall be filed with the county clerk in the county in which the election is held. Reports shall be filed on the appropriate forms furnished by the Secretary of State.

(d)

Reports Not Required.

(1)

A candidate who has not received contributions or made expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) shall not be required to file any preelection reports required under subdivision (a)(1) of this section. In calculating the amount of contributions received or expenditures made for purposes of this exception, the payment of the filing fee from the candidate's personal funds shall not be considered as either a contribution or an expenditure.

(2)

The preelection reports referenced in subdivision (a)(1) of this section are required only for candidates with opponents in those elections.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 788, § 3; 1977, No. 312, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1111; Acts 1987, No. 246, § 2; 1993, No. 1243, § 2; Init. Meas. 1996, No. 1, § 5; Acts 1999, No. 553, §§ 7-9; 2001, No. 1839, § 5; 2003, No. 195, § 4; 2007, No. 221, § 6; 2009, No. 1204, § 4; 2011, No. 721, § 7; 2013, No. 382, § 4; 2019, No. 240, § 4.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment added (a)(4) and made related changes; and substituted “When the candidate's campaign has ended, the'' for “The'' in (b)(2)(A); and added (b)(2)(B).

The 2009 amendment inserted “with loans stated separately” in (b)(1)(A), and made a related change.

The 2011 amendment, in (a)(2), inserted “the end of the month in which the candidate's name has appeared on the ballot in” and deleted “in which the candidate's name has appeared on the ballot” following “special election”; deleted “the contributor's place of business, employer, occupation, and date of the contribution and the amount contributed” at the end of (b)(1)(B); and substituted “§7-6-201(3)” for “§7-6-203(h)” in (b)(2)(A).

The 2013 amendment added “for the entire election cycle” at the end of (b)(1)(A).

The 2019 amendment inserted “or when only one (1) candidate qualifies for a particular office or position and no position or name of an unopposed candidate shall appear on a ballot” in (a)(2).

7-6-209. Reports of contributions — Candidates for county office.

(a)

Reports Required.

Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, each candidate for county office or a person acting in the candidate's behalf shall:

(1)

No later than seven (7) days prior to any preferential primary election, runoff election, general election, or special election in which the candidate's name appears on the ballot, file a preelection report of all contributions received and expenditures made between the period covered by the previous report, if any, and the period ten (10) days before the election. In case of a runoff election, the report shall cover all contributions received and expenditures made during that period of time that begins after the date of the election from which the runoff arose and ends ten (10) days before the runoff election;

(2)

No later than thirty (30) days after the end of the month in which the candidate's name has appeared on the ballot in any preferential primary election, runoff election, general election, or special election, or when only one (1) candidate qualifies for a particular office or position and no position or name of an unopposed candidate shall appear on a ballot, file a final report of all contributions received and expenditures made that have not been disclosed on reports previously required to be filed. A final report is required regardless of whether a candidate has received contributions or made expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500);

(3)

File supplemental reports of all contributions received and expenditures made after the date of preparation of the final report, and the supplemental reports shall be filed within thirty (30) days after the receipt of a contribution or the making of an expenditure; and

(4)(A)

No later than thirty (30) days after the end of the month in which the candidate has withdrawn, a final report of all contributions received and expenditures made that have not been disclosed on reports previously required to be filed.

(B)

If a candidate withdraws from the campaign, the candidate shall notify the county clerk in writing of the withdrawal.

(b)

Contents of Reports.

(1)

The contribution and expenditure reports required by subsection (a) of this section shall indicate:

(A)

The total amount of contributions received with loans stated separately, the total amount of expenditures made during the filing periods, and the cumulative amount of those totals for the entire election cycle;

(B)

The name and address of each person, including the candidate, who made a contribution or contributions that in the aggregate exceeded fifty dollars ($50.00);

(C)

The contributor's principal place of business, employer, occupation, the amount contributed, the date the contribution was accepted by the candidate, and the aggregate contributed for each election;

(D)

The name and address of each person, including the candidate, who contributed a nonmonetary item, together with a description of the item, the date of receipt, and the value, not including volunteer service by individuals;

(E)

An itemization of all single expenditures made that exceeded one hundred dollars ($100), including the amount of the expenditure, the name and address of any person, including the candidate, to whom the expenditure was made, and the date the expenditure was made;

(F)

A list of all paid campaign workers and the amount the workers were paid;

(G)

A list of all expenditures by categories, including, but not limited to:

(i)

Television, radio, print, or other advertising;

(ii)

Direct mail;

(iii)

Office supplies;

(iv)

Rent;

(v)

Travel;

(vi)

Expenses;

(vii)

Entertainment; and

(viii)

Telephone;

(H)

The total amount of all nonitemized expenditures made during the filing period; and

(I)

The current balance of campaign funds.

(2)(A)

When the candidate's campaign has ended, the final report shall also indicate which option under §7-6-203(g) was used to dispose of any surplus of campaign funds, the amount of funds disposed of by the candidate, and the amount of funds retained by the candidate in accordance with §7-6-201(3).

(B)

If the candidate's campaign has not ended, disposal of campaign funds is not required and the candidate may carry forward any remaining funds in the campaign to the general primary election, general election, or general runoff election for that same office.

(3)(A)

Not later than fourteen (14) days after the deadline for filing for office, the county clerk shall notify each candidate in person or by mail of the deadlines for filing the ten-day preelection and final reports required by subsection (a) of this section and, at that time, furnish each candidate with the appropriate forms and instructions for complying with the deadlines.

(B)

If notice is sent by mail, then the notice shall be postmarked within fourteen (14) days after the deadline for filing for office.

(c)

Filing of Reports.

The reports required by this section shall be filed with the county clerk in the county in which the election is held. Reports shall be filed on the appropriate forms furnished by the Secretary of State.

(d)

Reports Not Required.

(1)

A candidate who has not received contributions or made expenditures in excess of five hundred dollars ($500) shall not be required to file any preelection reports required under subdivision (a)(1) of this section. In calculating the amount of contributions received or expenditures made for purposes of this exception, the payment of the filing fee from the candidate's personal funds shall not be considered as either a contribution or an expenditure.

(2)

The preelection reports referenced in subdivision (a)(1) of this section are required only for candidates with opponents in those elections.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 788, § 3; 1977, No. 312, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1111; Acts 1987, No. 246, § 2; 1993, No. 1243, § 3; Init. Meas. 1996, No. 1, § 6; Acts 1999, No. 553, §§ 10-12; 2001, No. 1839, § 6; 2003, No. 195, § 5; 2007, No. 221, § 7; 2009, No. 1204, § 5; 2011, No. 721, § 8; 2013, No. 382, § 5; 2019, No. 240, § 5.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment added (a)(4) and made related changes; substituted “When the candidate's campaign has ended, the” for “The” in (b)(2)(A); and added (b)(2)(B).

The 2009 amendment inserted “with loans stated separately” in (b)(1)(A), and made a related change.

The 2011 amendment, in (a)(2), inserted “the end of the month in which the candidate's name has appeared on the ballot in” and deleted “in which the candidate's name has appeared on the ballot” following “special election”; deleted “the contributor's place of business, employer, occupation, and date of the contribution and the amount contributed” at the end of (b)(1)(B); and substituted “§7-6-201(3)” for “§7-6-203(h)” in (b)(2)(A).

The 2013 amendment added “for the entire election cycle” at the end of (b)(1)(A).

The 2019 amendment inserted “or when only one (1) candidate qualifies for a particular office or position and no position or name of an unopposed candidate shall appear on a ballot” in (a)(2).

7-6-210. Reports of contributions — Personal loans.

(a)(1)

The transfer of a candidate's own personal funds to his or her campaign shall be reported as either a loan from the candidate to his or her campaign or a contribution from the candidate to his or her campaign.

(2)

In the event the transfer of such funds is reported as a loan from the candidate to his or her campaign, the campaign funds may be used to repay the candidate for the funds loaned by the candidate to his or her campaign.

(3)

In the event the transfer of the funds is reported as a contribution from the candidate to his or her campaign, the campaign funds may not be used to reimburse the candidate for the funds contributed by the candidate to his or her campaign.

(b)(1)

A personal loan made to a candidate by a financial institution that is applied toward a candidate's campaign shall be reported as a loan from the candidate to his or her campaign.

(2)

The name of the financial institution, the amount of the loan, and the name of the guarantor, if any, also shall be reported.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 788, § 3; 1977, No. 312, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1111; Acts 1987, No. 246, § 2; 2009, No. 1204, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted present (a); redesignated former (a) and (b) as (b)(1) and (b)(2); substituted “loan from the candidate to his or her campaign” for “campaign contribution, as required by this subchapter” in (b)(1); and made minor stylistic changes.

7-6-211, 7-6-212. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning exemption from filing reports of contributions and reports of expenditures, were repealed by Acts 1999, No. 553, §§ 13, 14. The sections were derived from the following sources:

7-6-211. Acts 1975, No. 788, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1111.

7-6-212. Acts 1975, No. 788, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1112; Acts 1987, No. 246, § 3.

7-6-213. Verification of reports.

All reports required to be filed by the provisions of this subchapter shall be verified by affidavit by the candidate or a person acting in the candidate's behalf stating that to the best of his or her knowledge and belief the information so disclosed is a complete, true, and accurate financial statement of the candidate's campaign contributions or expenditures.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 788, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1114.

7-6-214. Publication of reports.

(a)(1)

Upon proper filing, the information required in §§7-6-203,7-6-207 —7-6-210,7-6-215,7-6-216, and7-6-220 shall constitute a public record and shall be available within twenty-four (24) hours of the reporting deadline to all interested persons and the news media.

(2)

The Secretary of State is the official custodian of the records that are required to be:

(A)

Filed with the Secretary of State; and

(B)

Maintained under §§7-6-203,7-6-207 —7-6-210,7-6-215,7-6-216, and7-6-220.

(b)(1)

The Secretary of State shall post on his or her official website reports of contributions required under §§7-6-203,7-6-207 —7-6-210,7-6-215,7-6-216, and7-6-220.

(2)

The official website of the Secretary of State shall allow for searches of campaign contribution and expenditure report information required to be filed in electronic form under §7-6-207(d)(1)(C)(i).

(c)(1)

The Secretary of State shall maintain a list of all reports required under §§7-6-203,7-6-207 —7-6-210,7-6-215,7-6-216, and7-6-220 not filed in electronic form.

(2)

The list shall include:

(A)

The name of the person filing the report;

(B)

The type of report filed;

(C)

The date the report was filed; and

(D)

The designation “paper filer”.

(3)

The list shall be posted on the official website of the Secretary of State.

(4)

The list shall be organized by calendar year and updated at least monthly on a schedule to be determined by the Secretary of State.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 788, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-1115; 2001, No. 564, § 2; 2015, No. 999, § 2; 2017, No. 318, § 4; 2017, No. 616, § 1; 2019, No. 1039, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment redesignated former (a) as (a)(1); in present (a)(1), inserted “7-6-203 and” and deleted “of this subchapter” preceding “shall constitute”; added (a)(2); and inserted “§7-6-203 and” in (b).

The 2017 amendment by No. 318 redesignated former (b) as (b)(1) and added (b)(2).

The 2017 amendment by No. 616 substituted “§§7-6-203,7-6-207 —7-6-210,7-6-215,7-6-216, and7-6-220” for “§§7-6-203 and7-6-207 —7-6-210” in (a)(1) and (a)(2)(B); and substituted “on his or her official website reports of contributions required under §§ 7-6-203, 7-6-207 — 7-6-210,7-6-215,7-6-216, and7-6-220” for “reports of contributions required in §§ 7-6-203 and 7-6-207 on his or her official website” in (b)(1).

The 2019 amendment added (c).